Wisconsin, session 2025, SB306.
do enact as follows:SB306,11Section 1. 36.25 (13h) of the statutes is created to read:SB306,2,5236.25 (13h) Virtual mental health services. (a) The board shall contract 3with a vendor to provide virtual mental health services for students enrolled in 4institutions that have not more than 30,000 full-time enrolled undergraduate 5students, as such enrollment was counted on the preceding April 1.SB306,2,116(b) The virtual mental health services provided by the vendor contracted with 7under par. (a) shall be designed to complement existing institution-based mental 8health offerings, expand students’ access to mental health support services beyond 9traditional business hours, and include evidence-based clinical wellness content 10and behavioral health coaches and licensed mental health providers with 11experience in delivering mental health care to students in higher education.SB306,2,1612(c) In contracting with a vendor under par. (a) the board shall prioritize the 13selection of a vendor with at least 5 years of experience in providing mental health 14services to institutions and students in higher education and that has 15demonstrated experience in providing a software that engenders collaboration 16among the vendor and clinical staff present at an institution of higher education.SB306,3,217(d) A vendor contracted with under par. (a) shall, on July 1 of each year it 18provides virtual mental health services to students enrolled in institutions, submit 19to the board and to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution 20under s. 13.172 (3) to the standing committees having jurisdiction over higher 21education matters a report regarding the vendor’s provision of virtual mental 22health services. The report shall include statistics regarding students’ use of the 1vendor’s virtual mental health services, which statistics shall be provided at both a 2system-wide level and on an institutional basis.SB306,3,33